District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-303.03

Competitive sealed bidding.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 303, 32 DCR 7396
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-243, § 2, 46 DCR 962
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 119(c), 47 DCR 520
Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-64, § 2(c), 56 DCR 6603
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1183.3.

Emergency Legislation

For exemption of a contract from the requirements of section, see § 2 of the Contract No. DCPS-C-99143-7373-AS (Special Education Management Information System) Advertising Exemption Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-368, July 10, 2000, 47 DCR 5830).

Editor's Notes

District of Columbia Public Schools exception: Section 123 of Pub. L. 104-194, 110 Stat. 2367, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1997, provided that no sole source contract with the District of Columbia government or any agency thereof maybe renewed or extended without opening that contract to the competitive bidding process as set forth in § 1-1183.3 § 2-303.03, 2001 Ed., except that the District of Columbia Public Schools may renew or extend sole source contracts for which competition is not feasible or practical, provided that the determination as to whether to invoke the competitive bidding process has been made in accordance with duly promulgated Board of Education rules and procedures.